Maryland, session 2026, HB0610.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
13–2101.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “County commissioners” means the [Board of] County Commissioners of St.
Mary’s County.
(c) “Designee” means a person designated by the county commissioners to
administer the issuance of bingo licenses OR GAMING LICENSES PERMITS in the county.
(d) (1) “GAMING DEVICE” MEANS A MECHANISM FOR PLAYING A GAME OF
CHANCE.
(2) “Gaming device” includes a paddle wheel, wheel of fortune, chance book,
bingo, Nevada card, and a stamp machine.
(2) (3) “Gaming device” does not include a slot machine, as defined in §
12–301 of this article.
– 1 –

Ch. 555 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(e) “Gaming event” means a carnival, bazaar, or raffle.
(f) “Qualified organization” means:
(1) a volunteer fire company; or
(2) a bona fide:
(i) religious organization;
(ii) fraternal organization;
(iii) civic organization;
(iv) war veterans’ organization; or
(v) charitable organization.
(g) “Sheriff” means the Sheriff of St. Mary’s County.
13–2111.
(A) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, A QUALIFIED
ORGANIZATION MUST HOLD A GAMING LICENSE PERMIT WHENEVER THE QUALIFIED
ORGANIZATION CONDUCTS OPERATES A GAMING DEVICE IN ACCORDANCE WITH
THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) A qualified organization may hold a gaming event and may operate a gaming
device if an individual or group of individuals does not:
(1) benefit financially from the operation of the gaming device; or
(2) receive from the operation of the gaming device any proceeds for
personal use or benefit.
(C) THE COUNTY COMMISSIONERS MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS, IN
CONSULTATION WITH THE DESIGNEE UNDER SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, TO
ADMINISTER AND ENFORCE GAMING ACTIVITIES AUTHORIZED THE GAMING DEVICE
PERMIT REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION IN THE COUNTY.
(D) THE COUNTY COMMISSIONERS SHALL DESIGNATE A PERSON TO
ADMINISTER THE ISSUANCE OF GAMING LICENSES PERMITS UNDER THIS SECTION
IN THE COUNTY.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 555
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October July 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 3 –